Massachusetts, session 194th, S2441.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 46 of Chapter 161A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting at the beginning the following:- “ (a)”
SECTION 2. Section 46 of Chapter 161A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting the following:-
“(b) All parking lots or garages located at Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority
commuter rail stations shall be free of charge to commuters for a period of no longer than 24
hours. Any vehicle occupying a parking space for a duration longer than 24 hours shall be
subject to charges of twenty dollars per day. Any commuter rail station also providing rapid
transit service shall be exempt from this section”.
of 1